Arkansas, session 2025, HB1817.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as "Elijah's Law".

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative intent.
It is the intent of the General Assembly to ensure that childcare
facilities take concrete steps to manage food allergies for the children in
their care, including the development of emergency protocols, strategies for
discussing food allergies, and plans for preventing exposure to food allergy
triggers, with the ultimate goal being to protect children’s lives and foster
safer environments to learn.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 13, is amended to add an
*JMB044*
03-19-2025 15:51:02 JMB044

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1817
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 19 — Childcare Facility Anaphylaxis Policy

20-13-1901. Definition.
As used in this subchapter, "childcare facility" means the same as
defined in § 20-78-202.

20-13-1902. Anaphylaxis policy for childcare facilities —
Informational materials.
(a)(1) Department of Education, in consultation with the Department of
Health and the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education, shall
establish an anaphylaxis policy for childcare facilities setting forth
guidelines and procedures for both the prevention of anaphylaxis and
treatment during a medical emergency resulting from anaphylaxis, including
without limitation:
(A) Establishing weight-based dosing guidelines for
epinephrine administration;
(B) Ensuring proper training and access to emergency
medication for children with food allergies; and
(C) Setting inspection and compliance requirements for
childcare facilities administered by the Department of Education.
(2) The Department of Education, in consultation with the
Department of Health and the division, may consult with individuals and
stakeholders to develop the anaphylaxis policy, including without limitation:
(A) Allergy medicine representatives;
(B) Pediatric physicians;
(C) Other healthcare providers with expertise in treating
children with anaphylaxis;
(D) Parents of children with life-threatening allergies;
(E) Childcare facility administrators;
(F) Childcare facility personnel;
(G) Childcare facility food service directors; and
(H) Appropriate nonprofit corporations representing
individuals with allergies who are at risk for anaphylaxis.
(b) In establishing the policy under this section, the Department of
Education, in consultation with the Department of Health and the division,
03-19-2025 15:51:02 JMB044

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1817
shall consider:
(1) Existing requirements, as well as current and best practices
for childcare facilities on allergies and anaphylaxis, including those in
place for childcare facilities regulated by the division; and
(2) The voluntary guidelines for managing food allergies in
early care and education programs issued by the United States Department of
Health and Human Services, to the extent appropriate for the setting.
(c) The Department of Education, in consultation with the Department
of Health and the division, shall create informational materials detailing
the anaphylaxis policy to be distributed to childcare facilities and shall
make the materials available on the websites of the Department of Health and
of the Department of Education.

20-13-1903. Anaphylaxis policy - Content.
The anaphylaxis policy established under this subchapter shall include
the following:
(1) A procedure and treatment plan detailing emergency protocols
and responsibilities of childcare facility personnel for responding to
anaphylaxis, including weight-based dosing guidelines for epinephrine
administration;
(2) A procedure and appropriate guidelines for the development
of an individualized emergency healthcare plan for children with a food
allergy or other allergy which could result in anaphylaxis;
(3) A communication plan for:
(A) Intake and dissemination of information provided by
the state regarding children with a food allergy or other allergy that could
result in anaphylaxis, including a discussion of methods, treatments, and
other therapies to reduce the risk of allergic reactions, including
anaphylaxis; and
(B) Discussion with children who have developed adequate
verbal communication and comprehension skills and with the parents or legal
guardians of all children about foods that are safe and unsafe to eat and
about strategies to avoid exposure to unsafe food; and
(4) A strategy for the reduction of the risk of exposure to
anaphylactic causative agents, including food and other allergens.

03-19-2025 15:51:02 JMB044

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1817
20-13-1904. Notification to parents and guardians.
(a) A childcare facility shall send a notification of the anaphylaxis
policy to the parent or legal guardian of a child attending or enrolled in
the childcare facility when the child is first enrolled to make the parent or
legal guardian of the child aware of the anaphylaxis policy under this
subchapter.
(b) A notification under this section shall include contact
information for the parent or legal guardian to engage further with the
childcare facility to learn more about individualized aspects of the
anaphylaxis policy.

20-13-1905. Notification to schools and childcare facilities of
anaphylaxis policy.
(a) Within one (1) year of the effective date of this subchapter, the
anaphylaxis policy established under this subchapter shall be forwarded by
the Department of Education to all childcare facilities.
(b) Each childcare facility shall implement or update as appropriate
the anaphylactic policy of the childcare facility in accordance with the
anaphylaxis policy developed under this subchapter within six (6) months of
receiving the anaphylaxis policy under this section.

20-13-1906. Update of anaphylaxis policy.
The anaphylaxis policy established under this subchapter shall be
updated if the Department of Education determines it is necessary or
desirable for the protection of children with a food allergy or other allergy
that could result in anaphylaxis.

20-13-1907. Financial support for implementation in childcare
facilities.
(a) A childcare facility may apply for funding through the federal
Child Care and Development Block Grant to cover costs related to:
(1) Staff training on food allergy management and the
administration of epinephrine; and
(2) The purchasing and maintaining of an adequate supply of
epinephrine, including devices appropriate for children of varying weights.
(b) The Department of Education shall make the application for funding
03-19-2025 15:51:02 JMB044

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 HB1817
through the federal Child Care and Development Block Grant available on the
website of the department.

/s/L. Johnson
































03-19-2025 15:51:02 JMB044